District of Columbia statutes.
29-1003.03

Organization of limited cooperative association.

(a)

After a limited cooperative association is formed:

(1)

If initial directors are named in the articles of organization, the initial directors shall hold an organizational meeting to adopt initial bylaws and carry on any other business necessary or proper to complete the organization of the association; or

(2)

If initial directors are not named in the articles of organization, the organizers shall designate the initial directors and call a meeting of the initial directors to adopt initial bylaws and carry on any other business necessary or proper to complete the organization of the association.

(b)

Unless the articles of organization otherwise provide, the initial directors may cause the limited cooperative association to accept members, including those necessary for the association to begin business.

(c)

Initial directors need not be members.

(d)

An initial director shall serve until a successor is elected and qualified at a members meeting or the director is removed, resigns, is adjudged incompetent, or dies.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09, § 29-1008.04, and § 29-1008.05.

Section References

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 303 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Editor's Notes